Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-329
State park system; real estate; acquisition; eminent domain; consent of Legislature.

With the consent of the Legislature, the commission is authorized and empowered to acquire, in the name of the State of Nebraska, real estate in this state of scenic, historic, recreational, or fish and wildlife management value or unique natural areas, or access thereto, by the use of eminent domain, as provided by sections 76-704 to 76-724.

Laws 1959, c. 436, § 6, p. 1466;

Laws 1963, c. 515, § 1, p. 1631;

Laws 1965, c. 551, § 1, p. 1800;

Laws 1967, c. 587, § 1, p. 1985;

Laws 1971, LB 724, § 1;

Laws 1974, LB 794, § 1;

R.S.1943, (1996), § 81-815.26;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 87.

Section not unconstitutional as being a special or local law; title of bill amending this section not unconstitutional for failing to include restrictions on disposition of property so acquired; section contains adequate constitutional standards for use of eminent domain. Duerfeldt v. State, 184 Neb. 242, 166 N.W.2d 737 (1969).